Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 97.1 of Title 42, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In the absence of any other agreement between the real property
owner and the owner of a manufactured home, any person, firm, or
corporation who allows an individual to use or occupy real property
in order to utilize a manufactured home shall have a lien for the
fair rental value with respect to such manufactured home if the
owner of the manufactured home does not exercise ownership or
control of the manufactured home for thirty (30) days or more. The
lien authorized by this act may be enforced in the same manner as
liens created by Section 97 of this title.
Req. No. 10270 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10270 AO 01/14/25





















Req. No. 10270 Page 2